Maryland, session 2026, HB0980.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
3–819.2.
(c) An order granting custody and guardianship to an individual under this
section:
(1) Rescinds the child’s commitment to the local department;
(2) Achieves the child’s permanency plan;
(3) [Terminates] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 5–551 OF THE FAMILY
LAW ARTICLE WITH RESPECT TO CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECKS OF ADULTS
RESIDING IN THE HOME OF THE GUARDIAN, TERMINATES the local department’s legal
obligations and responsibilities to the child; and
(4) Terminates the child’s case, unless the court finds good cause not to
terminate the child’s case.
– 3 –

Ch. 158 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Article – Family Law
5–530.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “GUARDIANSHIP ASSISTANCE” MEANS MONETARY AND MEDICAL
ASSISTANCE PROVIDED UNDER THE PROGRAM.
(3) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE GUARDIANSHIP ASSISTANCE PROGRAM.
(B) THE SECRETARY OF HUMAN SERVICES SHALL ESTABLISH AND
MAINTAIN A GUARDIANSHIP ASSISTANCE PROGRAM TO PROMOTE THE PLACEMENT
AND MAINTENANCE OF CHILDREN IN PERMANENT GUARDIANSHIP HOMES BY
PROVIDING GUARDIANSHIP ASSISTANCE TO GUARDIANS OF MINOR CHILDREN.
(C) A GUARDIAN OF A MINOR CHILD MAY BE ELIGIBLE FOR GUARDIANSHIP
ASSISTANCE IF:
(1) THE GUARDIAN IS APPOINTED UNDER § 5–326 OF THIS TITLE OR §
3–819.2 OF THE COURTS ARTICLE;
(2) THE MINOR CHILD IS PLACED IN FOSTER CARE IN THE
GUARDIAN’S FAMILY HOME AT LEAST 6 CONSECUTIVE MONTHS IMMEDIATELY
PRECEDING THE APPOINTMENT AS GUARDIAN; AND
(3) THE GUARDIAN ENTERED INTO A WRITTEN VOLUNTARY
GUARDIANSHIP ASSISTANCE AGREEMENT WITH A LOCAL DEPARTMENT BEFORE THE
APPOINTMENT AS GUARDIAN.
(D) ONCE APPROVED, GUARDIANSHIP ASSISTANCE MAY CONTINUE AFTER
AN INDIVIDUAL WITH AN APPOINTED GUARDIAN REACHES THE AGE OF 18 YEARS IF
THE INDIVIDUAL IS:
(1) ATTENDING SCHOOL;
(2) EMPLOYED ON AT LEAST A PART–TIME BASIS;
(3) PARTICIPATING IN A PROGRAM DESIGNED TO PROMOTE
EMPLOYMENT OPPORTUNITIES; OR
(4) INCAPABLE OF WORKING DUE TO A DISABILITY.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 158
(E) GUARDIANSHIP ASSISTANCE SHALL TERMINATE NOT LATER THAN THE
DAY THAT THE INDIVIDUAL WITH THE APPOINTED GUARDIAN REACHES THE AGE OF
21 YEARS.
(F) (1) LOCAL DEPARTMENTS SHALL ANNUALLY REVIEW THE
GUARDIANSHIP ASSISTANCE PROVIDED UNDER THIS SECTION.
(2) A LOCAL DEPARTMENT MAY TERMINATE GUARDIANSHIP
ASSISTANCE IF THE LOCAL DEPARTMENT DETERMINES, FOLLOWING AN ANNUAL
REVIEW, THAT AN ADULT LIVES IN THE GUARDIAN’S HOME AND IS UNDER THE
SUPERVISION OF A CRIMINAL COURT FOLLOWING A CONVICTION FOR A CRIME OF
VIOLENCE INVOLVING A CHILD VICTIM OR REQUIRED TO REGISTER WITH A
SUPERVISING AUTHORITY IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 11–704 OF THE CRIMINAL
PROCEDURE ARTICLE.
(G) THE SECRETARY OF HUMAN SERVICES SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO
CARRY OUT THIS SECTION.
Article – Human Services
2–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Department” means the Department of Human Services.
(c) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Human Services.
2–304.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “OMBUDSMAN” MEANS THE STATE FOSTER YOUTH
OMBUDSMAN.
(B) THERE IS A STATE FOSTER YOUTH OMBUDSMAN IN THE DEPARTMENT.
(C) (1) THE OMBUDSMAN SHALL:
(I) BE AN ATTORNEY ADMITTED TO PRACTICE LAW IN THE
STATE;
(II) HAVE EXPERIENCE IN CHILD WELFARE;
(III) BE APPOINTED BY THE SECRETARY; AND
– 5 –

Ch. 158 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(IV) BE A FULL–TIME EMPLOYEE IN THE MANAGEMENT SERVICE
OF THE STATE PERSONNEL MANAGEMENT SYSTEM.
(2) NOTWITHSTANDING § 11–305(B) OF THE STATE PERSONNEL AND
PENSIONS ARTICLE, THE OMBUDSMAN MAY BE REMOVED FROM OFFICE ONLY
AFTER A HEARING BEFORE THE DEPARTMENT AND A FINDING OF INCOMPETENCY
OR OTHER GOOD CAUSE.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL TAKE APPROPRIATE STEPS TO PROTECT THE
AUTONOMY AND INDEPENDENCE OF THE OMBUDSMAN.
(E) THE OMBUDSMAN IS ENTITLED TO AN ANNUAL SALARY AS PROVIDED
FOR IN THE STATE BUDGET.
(F) THE OMBUDSMAN SHALL:
(1) PROVIDE LEGAL EXPERTISE IN THE AREAS OF:
(I) CHILD WELFARE;
(II) CUSTODY AND GUARDIANSHIP MATTERS; AND
(III) APPEALS AND DUE PROCESS ISSUES;
(2) PROVIDE A NEUTRAL VOICE TO ADDRESS DIFFERENCES BETWEEN
YOUTH EXPERIENCING OUT–OF–HOME CARE, CAREGIVERS, GUARDIANS, AND
RESOURCE AND ADOPTIVE PARENTS INTERACTING WITH THE DEPARTMENT AND
WITH LOCAL DEPARTMENTS OF SOCIAL SERVICES;
(3) INVESTIGATE COMPLAINTS FROM YOUTH EXPERIENCING
OUT–OF–HOME CARE;
(4) ADDRESS CONCERNS, PROBLEMS, AREAS OF IMPROVEMENT IN
SERVICE DELIVERY, OR NEEDS ASSOCIATED WITH THE RIGHTS AND
RESPONSIBILITIES OF YOUTH EXPERIENCING OUT–OF–HOME CARE; AND
(5) ADVOCATE FOR YOUTH EXPERIENCING OUT–OF–HOME CARE.
5–324.
(b) (1) In a separate order accompanying an order granting guardianship of a
child, a juvenile court:
(i) shall include a directive terminating the child’s CINA case;
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 158
(ii) consistent with the child’s best interests:
1. may place the child:
A. subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, in a specific
type of facility; or
B. with a specific individual;
2. may direct provision of services by a local department to:
A. the child; or
B. the child’s caregiver;
3. subject to a local department retaining legal guardianship,
may award to a caregiver limited authority to make an emergency or ordinary decision as
to the child’s care, education, mental or physical health, or welfare;
4. may allow access to a medical or other record of the child;
5. may allow visitation for the child with a specific
individual;
6. may appoint, or continue the appointment of, a
court–appointed special advocate for any purpose set forth under § 3–830 of the Courts
Article;
7. shall direct the provision of any other service or taking of
any other action as to the child’s education, health, and welfare, including:
A. for a child who is at least 16 years old, services needed to
help the child’s transition from guardianship to independence; or
B. for a child with a developmental disability, services to
obtain ongoing care, if any, needed after the guardianship case ends; and
8. may co–commit the child to the custody of the Maryland
Department of Health and order the Maryland Department of Health to provide a plan for
the child of clinically appropriate services in the least restrictive setting, in accordance with
federal and State law;
(iii) FOR A CHILD PLACED WITH A SPECIFIC INDIVIDUAL, SHALL
DIRECT THE INDIVIDUAL TO IMMEDIATELY NOTIFY A LOCAL DEPARTMENT IF AN
ADULT BEGINS RESIDING IN THE HOME OF THE INDIVIDUAL AND THE ADULT HAS
– 7 –

Ch. 158 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
NOT COMPLETED A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK UNDER § 5–551 OF THIS
TITLE.
(IV) if entered under § 5–322 of this subtitle, shall state each party’s
response to the petition;
[(iv)] (V) shall state a specific factual finding on whether reasonable
efforts have been made to finalize the child’s permanency plan;
[(v)] (VI) shall state whether the child’s parent has waived the right
to notice; and
[(vi)] (VII) shall set a date, no later than 180 days after the date of
the order, for the initial guardianship review hearing under § 5–326 of this subtitle.
5–326.
(a) (10) (ii) [Designation] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 5–551 OF THIS
TITLE WITH RESPECT TO CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECKS OF ADULTS
RESIDING IN THE HOME OF THE GUARDIAN, DESIGNATION of a guardian under this
paragraph terminates the local department’s legal obligations and responsibilities to the
child.
5–328.1.
(A) AFTER A JUVENILE COURT GRANTS GUARDIANSHIP, IF A LOCAL
DEPARTMENT DETERMINES THAT REVIEW OF THE GUARDIANSHIP IS IN THE BEST
INTERESTS OF THE CHILD BASED ON INFORMATION RECEIVED FROM A CRIMINAL
HISTORY RECORDS CHECK UNDER § 5–551 OF THIS TITLE REGARDING AN ADULT
WHO RESIDES IN THE HOME OF THE GUARDIAN, THE LOCAL DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) FILE A PETITION FOR REVIEW OF THE GUARDIANSHIP WITH
THE JUVENILE COURT; AND
(2) GIVE NOTICE TO EACH PARTY.
(B) (1) THE JUVENILE COURT SHALL SCHEDULE A HEARING TO OCCUR
WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE FILING OF THE PETITION.
(2) IF THE JUVENILE COURT DETERMINES THAT IT IS IN THE BEST
INTERESTS OF THE CHILD, THE JUVENILE COURT SHALL:
(I) SET ASIDE THE GUARDIANSHIP ORDER;
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 158
(II) SCHEDULE A PROMPT TRIAL ON THE MERITS OF THE
GUARDIANSHIP PETITION; AND
(III) REOPEN THE CINA CASE FOR REVIEW AS REQUIRED UNDER
TITLE 3, SUBTITLE 8 OF THE COURTS ARTICLE.
5–525.
(a) (1) In this section[, “disability”] THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(2) (I) “DISABILITY” means:
[(i)] 1. a physical or mental impairment that substantially limits
one or more of an individual’s major life activities;
[(ii)] 2. a record of having a physical or mental impairment that
substantially limits one or more of an individual’s major life activities; or
[(iii)] 3. being regarded as having a physical or mental impairment
that substantially limits one or more of an individual’s major life activities.
[(2)] (II) “Disability” shall be construed in accordance with the ADA
Amendments Act of 2008, P.L. 110–325.
(3) (I) “UNLICENSED SETTING” MEANS A SETTING FOR AN
OUT–OF–HOME PLACEMENT THAT IS NOT LICENSED.
(II) “UNLICENSED SETTING” INCLUDES:
1. A HOTEL, MOTEL, OR SHORT–TERM RENTAL;
2. A SHELTER DESIGNATED TO MEET THE NEEDS OF A
CHILD WHO HAS RUN AWAY OR WHO IS HOMELESS; AND
3. AN OFFICE BUILDING OR OTHER NONRESIDENTIAL
ENVIRONMENT.
(III) “UNLICENSED SETTING” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
1. THE VOLUNTARY PLACEMENT OF A FORMER CINA;
OR
2. THE PLACEMENT OF A CHILD WITH:
– 9 –

Ch. 158 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
A. AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS A KINSHIP CAREGIVER OR
FOSTER PARENT OR WHO IS IN THE PROCESS OF APPLYING TO BE A KINSHIP
CAREGIVER OR FOSTER PARENT; OR
B. A PARENT, INCLUDING IN A FAMILY–BASED
RESIDENTIAL TREATMENT SETTING.
(b) (1) The Administration shall establish a program of out–of–home
placement for minor children:
(i) who are placed in the custody of a local department, for a period
of not more than 180 days, by a parent or legal guardian under a voluntary placement
agreement;
(ii) who are abused, abandoned, neglected, or dependent, if a
juvenile court:
1. has determined that continued residence in the child’s
home is contrary to the child’s welfare; and
2. has committed the child to the custody or guardianship of
a local department; or
(iii) who, with the approval of the Administration, are placed in an
out–of–home placement by a local department under a voluntary placement agreement
subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection.
(c) In establishing the out–of–home placement program the Administration:
(1) shall:
[(1)] (I) provide time–limited family reunification services to a child
placed in an out–of–home placement and to the parents or guardian of the child, in order
to facilitate the child’s safe and appropriate reunification within a timely manner;
[(2)] (II) concurrently develop and implement a permanency plan that is
in the best interests of the child; and
[(3)] (III) provide training on an annual basis for the staff at each local
department who administer requests for voluntary placement agreements for children with
developmental disabilities or mental illnesses under subsection (b) of this section; AND
(2) MAY NOT ALLOW A CHILD TO BE PLACED IN AN UNLICENSED
SETTING.
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 158
5–551.
(b) The following individuals shall obtain a criminal history records check under
this Part V of this subtitle:
(1) an individual who is seeking to adopt a child through a child placement
agency;
(2) an individual who is seeking to become a guardian through a local
department;
(3) an individual whom the juvenile court appoints as a guardian of a child;
(4) an adult relative with whom a child, committed to a local department,
is placed by the local department;
(5) any adult known by a local department or the State Department of
Education to be residing in:
(i) a family child care home or large family child care home required
to be registered under this title;
(ii) a home where informal child care, as defined in child care subsidy
regulations adopted under Title 13A of the Code of Maryland Regulations, is being provided
or will be provided to a child who does not reside there;
(iii) a home of an adult relative of a child with whom the child,
committed to a local department, is placed by the local department;
(iv) a foster care home or child care home required to be approved
under this title;
(v) a home of an individual seeking to adopt a child through a child
placement agency; [or]
(vi) a home of an individual seeking to become a guardian through a
local department; OR
(VII) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS SECTION, AN ADULT
IN THE HOME OF AN INDIVIDUAL WHOM THE JUVENILE COURT APPOINTS AS
GUARDIAN;
(6) an individual who agrees to provide, or to continue providing, informal
child care, as defined in child care subsidy regulations, adopted under Title 13A of the Code
of Maryland Regulations; and
– 11 –

Ch. 158 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(7) if requested by a local department:
(i) a parent or guardian of a child who is committed to the local
department and is or has been placed in an out–of–home placement within the past year;
and
(ii) any adult known by the local department to be residing in the
home of the parent or guardian.
(G) (1) TO CARRY OUT SUBSECTION (B)(5)(VII) OF THIS SECTION, AN
INDIVIDUAL WHO IS APPOINTED GUARDIAN BY THE JUVENILE COURT SHALL
PERIODICALLY PROVIDE TO THE LOCAL DEPARTMENT IN THE FORM AND MANNER
REQUIRED BY THE LOCAL DEPARTMENT THE NAME OF EACH ADULT RESIDING IN
THE GUARDIAN’S HOME.
(2) IF A LOCAL DEPARTMENT RECEIVES INFORMATION UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION OR § 5–324(B)(1)(III) OF THIS TITLE
INDICATING THAT AN ADULT IS RESIDING IN THE GUARDIAN’S HOME, AND THAT
ADULT HAS NOT OBTAINED A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK UNDER THIS
PART V OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE LOCAL DEPARTMENT SHALL IMMEDIATELY REFER
THE ADULT TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR COMPLETION OF A CRIMINAL HISTORY
RECORDS CHECK.
(3) ON COMPLETION OF A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK
UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, IF THE LOCAL DEPARTMENT
DETERMINES THAT IT IS IN THE BEST INTERESTS OF THE CHILD, THE LOCAL
DEPARTMENT SHALL FILE A PETITION WITH THE JUVENILE COURT IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 5–328.1 OF THIS TITLE TO REVIEW THE GUARDIANSHIP.
(4) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT
THIS SUBSECTION.
[(g)] (H) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, a person
who is required to have a criminal history records check under this Part V of this subtitle
shall pay for:
(i) the mandatory processing fee required by the Federal Bureau of
Investigation for a national criminal history records check;
(ii) reasonable administrative costs to the Department, not to exceed
10% of the processing fee; and
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 158
(iii) the fee authorized under § 10–221(b)(7) of the Criminal
Procedure Article for access to Maryland criminal history records.
(2) A volunteer under subsection (c), (d), or (e) of this section who
volunteers for a program that is registered with the Maryland Mentoring Partnership is
required to pay only the mandatory processing fee required by the Federal Bureau of
Investigation for a national criminal history records check.
[(h)] (I) (1) An employer or other party may pay for the costs borne by the
employee or other individual under subsection [(g)] (H) of this section.
(2) The local department shall reimburse:
(i) an adult residing in a foster care home for the costs borne by the
individual under subsection [(g)] (H) of this section; and
(ii) an individual described in subsection (b)(7)(ii) of this section for
the costs borne by the individual under subsection [(g)] (H) of this section.
Article – State Government
6–101.
[In] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBTITLE 5A OF THIS TITLE, IN this title, “Office”
means the Office of the Attorney General.
SUBTITLE 5A. OFFICE OF THE CHILD WELFARE OMBUDSMAN.
6–5A–01.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “CUSTODY” MEANS:
(1) PHYSICAL OR LEGAL CUSTODY OF A CHILD; OR
(2) THE RESPONSIBILITY CREATED BY LAW OR A COURT ORDER FOR
THE CARE OF A CHILD.
(C) “DEPARTMENT” MEANS THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES.
(D) “LOCAL DEPARTMENT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 3–101 OF THE
HUMAN SERVICES ARTICLE.
– 13 –

Ch. 158 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(E) “OFFICE” MEANS THE OFFICE OF THE CHILD WELFARE OMBUDSMAN
IN THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
(F) “OMBUDSMAN” MEANS THE CHILD WELFARE OMBUDSMAN.
(G) “SECRETARY” MEANS THE SECRETARY OF HUMAN SERVICES.
6–5A–02.
(A) THERE IS AN OFFICE OF THE CHILD WELFARE OMBUDSMAN IN THE
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE OFFICE IS TO INVESTIGATE AND DETERMINE
WHETHER:
(1) THE NEEDS OF CHILDREN AND FAMILIES UNDER THE
JURISDICTION OF THE DEPARTMENT OR A LOCAL DEPARTMENT ARE BEING MET IN
COMPLIANCE WITH STATE LAW;
(2) THE RIGHTS OF CHILDREN AND FAMILIES ARE BEING UPHELD;
AND
(3) THE CHILDREN ARE NOT BEING ABUSED OR NEGLECTED.
6–5A–03.
(A) (1) WITH THE ADVICE AND CONSENT OF THE SENATE AND INPUT
FROM CURRENT OR FORMER FOSTER CHILDREN, SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF
THIS SUBSECTION, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL APPOINT THE CHILD WELFARE
OMBUDSMAN.
(2) THE OMBUDSMAN SHALL:
(I) HAVE BEEN ADMITTED TO PRACTICE LAW IN THE STATE;
AND
(II) HAVE AT LEAST 5 YEARS OF EXPERIENCE IN CHILD
WELFARE.
(B) (1) THE TERM OF THE OMBUDSMAN IS 5 YEARS.
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 158
(2) AT THE END OF A TERM, THE OMBUDSMAN CONTINUES TO SERVE
UNTIL A SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED AND QUALIFIES.
(3) AN OMBUDSMAN WHO IS APPOINTED AFTER A TERM BEGINS
SERVES FOR THE REMAINDER OF THE TERM UNTIL A SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED AND
QUALIFIES.
(C) BEFORE TAKING OFFICE, THE OMBUDSMAN SHALL TAKE THE OATH
REQUIRED BY ARTICLE I, § 9 OF THE MARYLAND CONSTITUTION.
(D) THE OMBUDSMAN SHALL BE A FULL–TIME STATE EMPLOYEE.
(E) THE OMBUDSMAN IS ENTITLED TO AN ANNUAL SALARY AS PROVIDED
FOR IN THE STATE BUDGET.
(F) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY REMOVE THE CHILD WELFARE
OMBUDSMAN FOR GOOD CAUSE SHOWN AFTER NOTICE AND AN OPPORTUNITY TO BE
HEARD.
6–5A–04.
(A) THE OFFICE SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) A FULL–TIME OMBUDSMAN; AND
(2) STAFF, INCLUDING ASSISTANT OMBUDSMEN, AS ALLOWED FOR IN
THE STATE BUDGET.
(B) (1) THE OMBUDSMAN MAY APPOINT AND EMPLOY THE
PROFESSIONAL, INVESTIGATIVE, AND CLERICAL STAFF PROVIDED FOR IN THE
STATE BUDGET.
(2) THE OMBUDSMAN, AS NECESSARY, MAY HIRE OR CONTRACT WITH
EXPERTS IN THE FIELD OF CHILD WELFARE.
(C) (1) TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, THE OMBUDSMAN SHALL USE THE
SERVICES AND PERSONNEL OF:
(I) THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL;
(II) THE DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE; AND
(III) OTHER STATE AND LAW ENFORCEMENT UNITS.
– 15 –

Ch. 158 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) THE UNITS LISTED IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION
SHALL COOPERATE, TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, WITH THE OMBUDSMAN AND
THE OMBUDSMAN’S STAFF.
(D) IN COOPERATION WITH THE SECRETARY OF BUDGET AND
MANAGEMENT, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL SET MINIMUM SALARIES,
QUALIFICATIONS, AND STANDARDS OF TRAINING AND EXPERIENCE FOR POSITIONS
IN THE OFFICE.
6–5A–05.
(A) THE BUDGET OF THE OMBUDSMAN AND THE OFFICE SHALL BE A PART
OF THE BUDGET OF THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
(B) SALARIES OF THE OMBUDSMAN AND ASSISTANT OMBUDSMEN AND
EXPENSES FOR RENT, EQUIPMENT, SUPPLIES, AND GENERAL OPERATING EXPENSES
NECESSARY FOR THE WORK OF THE OFFICE SHALL BE AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE
BUDGET.
(C) THE GOVERNOR SHALL PROVIDE IN THE STATE BUDGET SUFFICIENT
MONEY FOR THE OFFICE TO HIRE NECESSARY STAFF.
(D) IF THE BUDGET FOR THE OFFICE IS INSUFFICIENT TO ALLOW THE
OFFICE TO PERFORM THE DUTIES OF THE OFFICE, THE OMBUDSMAN MAY APPLY TO
THE BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS FOR ADDITIONAL MONEY FROM THE GENERAL
EMERGENCY FUND.
6–5A–06.
(A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, OR AS
OTHERWISE PROVIDED BY LAW, ALL PERSONNEL OF THE OFFICE ARE SUBJECT TO
THE PROVISIONS OF THE STATE PERSONNEL AND PENSIONS ARTICLE.
(B) THE COMPENSATION OF THE FOLLOWING PERSONNEL SHALL BE
DETERMINED BY THE OMBUDSMAN AND, IF POSSIBLE, IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
STATE PAY PLAN:
(1) ASSISTANT OMBUDSMEN;
(2) ATTORNEYS THAT ARE SPECIAL APPOINTEES OR IN THE
MANAGEMENT SERVICE; AND
– 16 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 158
(3) ALL POSITIONS IN MANAGEMENT, PROFESSIONAL, AND SKILLED
SERVICE CLASSIFICATIONS UNIQUE TO THE OFFICE.
(C) (1) AT LEAST 45 DAYS BEFORE THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF A CHANGE IN
SALARY PLAN, THE OMBUDSMAN SHALL SUBMIT TO THE SECRETARY OF BUDGET
AND MANAGEMENT EACH CHANGE THAT INVOLVES AN INCREASE OR A DECREASE IN
SALARY RANGES OTHER THAN THOSE ASSOCIATED WITH ROUTINE CLASSIFICATIONS
AND PROMOTIONS OR GENERAL SALARY INCREASES APPROVED BY THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY.
(2) THE SECRETARY OF BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT SHALL:
(I) REVIEW THE PROPOSED CHANGES; AND
(II) AT LEAST 15 DAYS BEFORE THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THE
PROPOSED CHANGES, ADVISE THE OMBUDSMAN WHETHER THE CHANGES WOULD
HAVE AN ADVERSE EFFECT ON COMPARABLE STATE JOBS.
(3) FAILURE OF THE SECRETARY TO RESPOND IN A TIMELY MANNER
MAY NOT BE CONSIDERED A STATEMENT OF ADVERSE EFFECT UNDER PARAGRAPH
(2)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(D) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 31 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2028, THE
OMBUDSMAN SHALL REPORT TO THE SECRETARY OF BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT
AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THIS ARTICLE, TO THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY ALL PERSONNEL POSITIONS, CLASSIFICATIONS, AND SALARIES IN THE
OFFICE AS OF THE END OF THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR.
6–5A–07.
THE OFFICE SHALL:
(1) IDENTIFY, RECEIVE, INVESTIGATE, AND SEEK THE RESOLUTION
OR REFERRAL OF COMPLAINTS MADE BY OR ON BEHALF OF A CHILD INVOLVED IN
CHILD IN NEED OF ASSISTANCE CASES CONCERNING ANY ACT, OMISSION, PRACTICE,
POLICY, OR PROCEDURE OF A STATE OR LOCAL AGENCY OR ANY PERSON WORKING
ON BEHALF OF THE AGENCY THAT MAY ADVERSELY AFFECT THE HEALTH, SAFETY,
OR WELFARE OF THE CHILD;
(2) INSPECT AND REVIEW THE OPERATION, POLICIES, AND
PROCEDURES OF FOSTER CARE HOMES, GROUP HOMES, KINSHIP CARE HOMES,
RESIDENTIAL TREATMENT FACILITIES, SHELTERS FOR THE CARE OF ABUSED OR
NEGLECTED CHILDREN, AND INDEPENDENT LIVING ARRANGEMENTS OPERATED,
– 17 –

Ch. 158 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
LICENSED, OR APPROVED FOR PAYMENT BY THE DEPARTMENT OR A LOCAL
DEPARTMENT OR USED BY THE DEPARTMENT OR BY A LOCAL DEPARTMENT FOR THE
CARE OF CHILDREN IN ITS CUSTODY;
(3) REVIEW, EVALUATE, REPORT, AND MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS TO
A STATE OR LOCAL AGENCY CONCERNING PROCEDURES ESTABLISHED BY THE
AGENCY TO PROVIDE SERVICES TO CHILDREN AND FAMILIES THAT ARE AT RISK OF
ABUSE OR NEGLECT, CHILDREN IN STATE OR INSTITUTIONAL CUSTODY, OR
CHILDREN AND FAMILIES WHO RECEIVE CHILD PROTECTIVE KINSHIP CARE OR
FOSTER CARE SERVICES;
(4) RECEIVE, INVESTIGATE, AND MAKE REFERRALS TO OTHER STATE
OR LOCAL AGENCIES, OR TAKE OTHER APPROPRIATE ACTIONS WITH RESPECT TO A
COMPLAINT RECEIVED BY THE OFFICE REGARDING THE ACTIONS OF THE
DEPARTMENT OR A LOCAL DEPARTMENT OR A STATE–FUNDED PRIVATE ENTITY
THAT PROVIDES SERVICES TO CHILDREN AND FAMILIES WHO ARE AT RISK OF ABUSE
OR NEGLECT, CHILDREN IN STATE OR INSTITUTIONAL CUSTODY, OR CHILDREN AND
FAMILIES WHO RECEIVE CHILD PROTECTIVE, KINSHIP CARE, OR FOSTER CARE
SERVICES;
(5) ESTABLISH AND MAINTAIN A 24–HOUR TOLL–FREE TELEPHONE
HELPLINE AND WEBSITE TO RECEIVE AND RESPOND TO CALLS FROM INDIVIDUALS
REGARDING THE WELFARE OF CHILDREN UNDER THE JURISDICTION OF THE
DEPARTMENT OR A LOCAL DEPARTMENT;
(6) CONDUCT UNANNOUNCED SITE VISITS AT REASONABLE TIMES
AND IN A REASONABLE MANNER TO ANY INSTITUTION OR FACILITY TO WHICH
CHILDREN ARE COMMITTED OR PLACED, IF:
(I) THE OMBUDSMAN, BEFORE CONDUCTING AN
UNANNOUNCED SITE VISIT, HAS INITIATED AN INVESTIGATION INTO THE RESPONSE
OR DISPOSITION OF AN ALLEGATION OF ABUSE OR NEGLECT AT THE INSTITUTION
OR FACILITY; AND
(II) THERE IS A REASONABLE BASIS TO BELIEVE THAT AN
UNANNOUNCED SITE VISIT IS NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT THE OMBUDSMAN’S
RESPONSIBILITIES UNDER THIS SUBTITLE;
(7) CONSULT WITH ANY APPROPRIATE STATE OR COUNTY AGENCY OR
STATE–FUNDED PRIVATE ENTITY PROVIDING CHILD WELFARE SERVICES TO
CHILDREN, AND MAY REQUEST FROM ANY SUCH ENTITY, WHICH IS HEREBY
AUTHORIZED AND DIRECTED TO PROVIDE, SUCH COOPERATION AND ASSISTANCE AS
– 18 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 158
WILL ENABLE THE CHILD ADVOCATE TO PROPERLY PERFORM ITS RESPONSIBILITIES
UNDER THIS SECTION; AND
(8) ESTABLISH AND IMPLEMENT PROCEDURES FOR RECEIVING,
PROCESSING, RESPONDING TO, AND RESOLVING COMPLAINTS MADE BY OR ON
BEHALF OF CHILDREN WHO ARE RECIPIENTS OF THE SERVICES OF THE LOCAL
DEPARTMENTS, AS PROVIDED FOR IN § 6–5A–09 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
6–5A–08.
(A) THE OMBUDSMAN MAY:
(1) REVIEW AND COPY RELEVANT LAWS, POLICIES, PROCEDURES,
AND DEPARTMENT AND LOCAL DEPARTMENT RECORDS AND REPORTS, INCLUDING
RECORDS RELATING TO AN INDIVIDUAL CHILD;
(2) CONDUCT INTERVIEWS WITH STAFF, CHILDREN, AND OTHERS;
(3) ISSUE SUBPOENAS TO COMPEL THE ATTENDANCE AND TESTIMONY
OF WITNESSES OR THE PRODUCTION OF BOOKS, PAPERS, AND OTHER DOCUMENTS;
(4) ADMINISTER OATHS TO WITNESSES IN ANY MATTER UNDER
INVESTIGATION IN THE OFFICE; AND
(5) IF THE OMBUDSMAN CONSIDERS THAT LEGISLATION WOULD
AFFECT THE INTERESTS OF PERSONS UNDER ITS JURISDICTION, RECOMMEND THE
LEGISLATION TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
(B) (1) IF A PERSON TO WHOM A SUBPOENA IS ISSUED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A)(3) OF THIS SECTION FAILS TO APPEAR OR, HAVING APPEARED,
REFUSES TO GIVE TESTIMONY, OR FAILS TO PRODUCE THE BOOKS, PAPERS, OR
OTHER DOCUMENTS REQUIRED, THE OMBUDSMAN MAY APPLY TO THE
APPROPRIATE CIRCUIT COURT FOR RELIEF.
(2) THE APPROPRIATE COURT MAY ORDER THE PERSON TO APPEAR
AND GIVE TESTIMONY OR PRODUCE THE BOOKS, PAPERS, OR OTHER DOCUMENTS,
AS APPLICABLE.
6–5A–09.
(A) A CHILD WHO IS A RECIPIENT OF THE SERVICES OF THE DEPARTMENT
OR A LOCAL DEPARTMENT OR A CHILD IDENTIFIED AS A CHILD IN NEED OF
– 19 –

Ch. 158 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
ASSISTANCE UNDER TITLE 3, SUBTITLE 8 OF THE COURTS ARTICLE MAY FILE A
COMPLAINT WITH THE OMBUDSMAN:
(1) BY CALLING THE OMBUDSMAN’S 24–HOUR TOLL–FREE HELPLINE;
(2) BY FILING THE COMPLAINT ELECTRONICALLY WITH THE OFFICE;
(3) BY MEETING IN PERSON WITH STAFF FROM THE OFFICE;
(4) THROUGH AN ADULT REPRESENTING THE CHILD’S INTERESTS; OR
(5) BY ANY OTHER REASONABLE MEANS ESTABLISHED BY THE
OMBUDSMAN.
(B) THE COMPLAINT PROCESS SHALL BE CONFIDENTIAL, EXPEDIENT, AND
RESPONSIVE TO THE CHILD’S PERCEPTION OF SAFETY ISSUES AND THE CHILD’S
EMOTIONAL NEEDS.
(C) THE OMBUDSMAN SHALL ESTABLISH AND IMPLEMENT APPROPRIATE
RESPONSE TIMES AND SAFETY MEASURES FOR DIFFERENT TYPES OF COMPLAINTS.
(D) FOR A CHILD WITH SAFETY CONCERNS ABOUT THE CHILD’S
OUT–OF–HOME PLACEMENT, THE CHILD’S SAFETY MUST BE PARAMOUNT SO THAT
THE CHILD FEELS COMFORTABLE REPORTING COMPLAINTS AND FEELS SAFE
PENDING THE OUTCOME OF ANY INVESTIGATION.
(E) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE LOCAL
DEPARTMENT SHALL INCLUDE, IN DEVELOPMENTALLY APPROPRIATE LANGUAGE,
INFORMATION IN EACH CHILD’S RECORD ABOUT THE COMPLAINT PROCEDURE.
(2) THE INFORMATION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE DEFINITION OF A COMPLAINT, INCLUDING EXAMPLES
OF SITUATIONS WHERE IT IS APPROPRIATE TO FILE A COMPLAINT;
(II) HOW TO FILE A FORMAL COMPLAINT WITH THE OFFICE;
(III) AN EXPLANATION OF THE PURPOSES OF THE OFFICE;
(IV) THE RESPONSE TIMES ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION
(C) OF THIS SECTION;
– 20 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 158
(V) POTENTIAL RESOLUTIONS BASED ON THE TYPE OF
COMPLAINTS;
(VI) HOW THE CHILD’S SAFETY WILL BE PROTECTED DURING
THE INVESTIGATION OF THE COMPLAINT;
(VII) AN EXPLANATION OF THE CHILD’S RIGHTS AS OUTLINED IN
ANY DEPARTMENT HANDBOOK FOR CHILDREN IN FOSTER CARE; AND
(VIII) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THE OFFICE REQUIRES.
(3) A CHILD SHALL BE GIVEN THE INFORMATION:
(I) AT THE CHILD’S INITIAL COURT HEARING;
(II) BEFORE ANY SUBSEQUENT COURT HEARINGS; AND
(III) BEFORE EVERY NEW PLACEMENT.
(F) THE OFFICE SHALL PROVIDE TRAINING ON COMPLAINT POLICIES AND
PROCEDURES TO ALL LOCAL DEPARTMENT CASEWORKERS, ATTORNEYS FOR
CHILDREN, OUT–OF–HOME PLACEMENT PROVIDERS, COURT–APPOINTED SPECIAL
ADVOCATES, JUDICIAL OFFICERS, AND OTHER PROFESSIONALS WORKING WITH
CHILDREN THROUGH THEIR CHILD IN NEED OF ASSISTANCE CASES AS PART OF
THEIR EMPLOYMENT ORIENTATION AND CONTINUING PROFESSIONAL
DEVELOPMENT.
(G) (1) ON CONCLUSION OF AN INVESTIGATION UNDER THIS SECTION,
THE OFFICE SHALL INFORM THE CHILD, IN A DEVELOPMENTALLY APPROPRIATE
MANNER, OF THE OUTCOME OF THE INVESTIGATION.
(2) IF THE OUTCOME OF THE INVESTIGATION ENTAILS SITE VISITS
WITH THE CHILD FOR A SPECIFIED PERIOD OF TIME, THE CHILD SHALL BE
INFORMED OF THE SCOPE AND INTENT OF THIS FOLLOW–UP PROCESS.
(H) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE OMBUDSMAN SHALL TREAT ALL COMPLAINTS RECEIVED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION AS CONFIDENTIAL, INCLUDING THE IDENTITIES
OF COMPLAINANTS AND INDIVIDUALS FROM WHOM INFORMATION IS ACQUIRED.
(2) THE OMBUDSMAN MAY DISCLOSE INFORMATION AS NECESSARY
TO ENABLE THE OMBUDSMAN TO PERFORM THE OMBUDSMAN’S DUTIES AND TO
SUPPORT ANY RECOMMENDATIONS RESULTING FROM AN INVESTIGATION.
– 21 –

Ch. 158 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(I) RECORDS RELATING TO COMPLAINTS RECEIVED BY THE OFFICE AND
THE INVESTIGATION OF COMPLAINTS ARE EXEMPT FROM DISCLOSURE UNDER THE
PUBLIC INFORMATION ACT.
6–5A–10.
(A) THE OFFICE SHALL REPORT IN A TIMELY MANNER TO THE SECRETARY
AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THIS ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY:
(1) KNOWLEDGE OF ANY SYSTEMIC OR LIFE–THREATENING
PROBLEMS AND ANY FINDINGS, ACTIONS, AND RECOMMENDATIONS RELATING TO
INVESTIGATIONS REGARDING THE CARE, SUPERVISION, AND TREATMENT OF:
(I) CHILDREN AND FAMILIES WHO ARE AT RISK OF ABUSE OR
NEGLECT;
(II) CHILDREN IN DEPARTMENT OR LOCAL DEPARTMENT
CUSTODY; OR
(III) CHILDREN AND FAMILIES WHO RECEIVE CHILD
PROTECTIVE KINSHIP CARE OR FOSTER CARE SERVICES; AND
(2) ALL OTHER FINDINGS, ACTIONS, AND RECOMMENDATIONS
RELATED TO THE ACTIVITIES REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) (1) THE OFFICE SHALL REPORT QUARTERLY TO THE SECRETARY.
(2) A COPY OF THE REPORT SHALL BE PROVIDED TO THE CITIZENS
REVIEW BOARD FOR CHILDREN, THE STATE COUNCIL ON CHILD ABUSE AND
NEGLECT, AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THIS ARTICLE, THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY.
(3) THE REPORT SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) ALL ACTIVITIES OF THE OFFICE;
(II) ALL COMPLAINTS MADE TO THE OFFICE INCLUDING:
1. THE JURISDICTION WHERE THE INCIDENT
OCCURRED;
– 22 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 158
2. THE JURISDICTION THAT HAS CARE AND CUSTODY OF
THE CHILD IN NEED OF ASSISTANCE WHOSE CASE IS BEING REVIEWED;
3. THE NATURE OF THE COMPLAINT;
4. THE DISPOSITION OF THE COMPLAINT;
5. WHAT, IF ANY, FOLLOW–UP ACTION THE OFFICE TOOK
AND WHY;
6. THE CHILD’S PLACEMENT; AND
7. DEMOGRAPHIC INFORMATION ABOUT THE CHILD
INCLUDING AGE, GENDER IDENTITY, RACE, AND ETHNICITY;
(III) ACTIONS TAKEN BY THE DEPARTMENT OR A LOCAL
DEPARTMENT RESULTING FROM THE FINDINGS AND RECOMMENDATIONS OF THE
OFFICE, INCLUDING THE RESPONSE BY THE DEPARTMENT OR LOCAL DEPARTMENT;
AND
(IV) A SUMMARY OF ANY VIOLATIONS OF THE STANDARDS AND
REGULATIONS OF THE DEPARTMENT THAT REMAINED UNABATED FOR 30 DAYS OR
MORE DURING THE REPORTING PERIOD.
(C) ON OR BEFORE NOVEMBER 30 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2028, THE
OFFICE SHALL REPORT TO THE SECRETARY, THE CITIZENS REVIEW BOARD FOR
CHILDREN, THE STATE COUNCIL ON CHILD ABUSE AND NEGLECT, THE GOVERNOR,
AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THIS ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
ON ALL THE ACTIVITIES OF THE OFFICE AND THE ACTIONS TAKEN BY THE
DEPARTMENT IN RESPONSE TO FINDINGS AND RECOMMENDATIONS OF THE OFFICE.
(D) BEFORE SUBMITTING A REPORT UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OR (C) OF THIS
SECTION, THE OFFICE SHALL REMOVE ANY IDENTIFYING INFORMATION AS
NECESSARY TO PROTECT THE PRIVACY OF THE CHILD AND THE CHILD’S FAMILY.
6–5A–11.
(A) A PERSON MAY NOT:
(1) DISCRIMINATE OR RETALIATE IN ANY MANNER AGAINST ANY
PERSON FOR:
(I) FILING A COMPLAINT UNDER THIS SUBTITLE; OR
– 23 –

Ch. 158 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) PROVIDING INFORMATION TO AN ADVOCATE OF A CHILD IN
GOOD FAITH; OR
(2) WILLFULLY INTERFERE WITH AN ADVOCATE OF A CHILD IN THE
PERFORMANCE OF THE ADVOCATE’S OFFICIAL DUTIES.
(B) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION IS GUILTY
OF A MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO A FINE NOT EXCEEDING
$5,000 OR IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 5 YEARS OR BOTH.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026 2027.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 24 –